Arkansas, session 2025, HB1944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 24, Subchapter 14, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-24-1433. Arkansas EMS Foundation.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall create and issue an Arkansas EMS Foundation special license plate in
the manner and subject to the conditions provided for under this subchapter.
(b) The Arkansas EMS Foundation special license plate shall be:
(1) Designed by the Department of Finance and Administration in
consultation with the Arkansas EMS Foundation; and
(2) Numbered consecutively.
(c) The procedures concerning costs for issuance under § 27-24-
*ZRC123*
04-07-2025 10:18:50 ZRC123

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1944
1404(c)(1)(A) shall apply.
(d) The department shall issue a special license plate under this
section to a motor vehicle owner upon payment of:
(1) The fee required by law for registration of the motor
vehicle;
(2)(A) Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to cover the design-use
contribution.
(B) The design-use contribution shall be remitted monthly
to the Arkansas EMS Foundation to be used exclusively to promote and support
the Arkansas EMS Foundation; and
(3)(A) A handling and administrative fee of ten dollars
($10.00).
(B) The handling and administrative fee shall be:
(i) Deposited into the State Central Services Fund
for the benefit of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration; and
(ii) Credited to the division as supplemental and in
addition to all other funds that may be deposited for the benefit of the
division.
(C) The handling and administrative fee shall not be
considered or credited to the division as direct revenue.
(e)(1) A special license plate issued under this section may be
renewed annually or replaced under the procedures set out in § 27-24-1405.
(2) The division shall remit the fees collected under § 27-24-
1405(b)(2) for the renewal of a special license plate issued under this
section on a monthly basis to the Arkansas EMS Foundation.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-24-1428 is repealed.
27-24-1428. Grand Lodge of Arkansas special license plate.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall create and issue a Grand Lodge of Arkansas special license plate in the
manner and subject to the conditions provided for under this subchapter.
(b) The Grand Lodge of Arkansas special license plate shall be:
(1) Designed by the Department of Finance and Administration in
consultation with the Grand Lodge of Arkansas, the ruling body of the
Arkansas Masons; and
04-07-2025 10:18:50 ZRC123

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1944
(2) Numbered consecutively.
(c) The procedures concerning costs for issuance under § 27-24-
1404(c)(1)(A) shall apply.
(d) The department shall issue a special license plate under this
section to a motor vehicle owner upon:
(1) Presentment of a current dues card issued to the motor
vehicle owner by the Arkansas Masonic Lodge of Free and Accepted Masons
showing he has paid his annual membership dues; and
(2) Payment of:
(A) The fee required by law for registration of the motor
vehicle;
(B)(i) Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to cover the design-
use contribution.
(ii) The design-use contribution shall be remitted
monthly to The Most Worshipful Grand Lodge, Free and Accepted Masons of the
State of Arkansas, and its Masonic Jurisdiction to be used exclusively to
promote and support the Grand Lodge of Arkansas and the Arkansas Masons; and
(C)(i) A handling and administrative fee of ten dollars
($10.00).
(ii) The handling and administrative fee of ten
dollars ($10.00) shall be:
(a) Deposited into the State Central Services
Fund for the benefit of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration; and
(b) Credited to the division as supplemental
and in addition to all other funds that may be deposited for the benefit of
the division.
(iii) The handling and administrative fee shall not
be considered or credited to the division as direct revenue.
(e)(1) A special license plate issued under this section may be
renewed annually or replaced under the procedures set out in § 27-24-1405.
(2) However, the division shall remit the fees collected under §
27-24-1405(b)(2) on a monthly basis to The Most Worshipful Grand Lodge, Free
and Accepted Masons of the State of Arkansas, and its Masonic Jurisdiction.

/s/Vaught
04-07-2025 10:18:50 ZRC123